Utah statutes.
7-7-21.   Powers of associations.
(1)  Every association incorporated or operating under the provisions of this
chapter shall have all the powers enumerated, authorized, and permitted by
this chapter and such other rights, privileges, and powers as may be
incidental to or reasonably necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of
the objects and purposes of the association.
(2)  Among others, and except as otherwise limited by the provisions of this
chapter, every association shall have the following powers:
(a)  to have perpetual existence, to adopt and use a corporate seal, which may
be affixed by imprint, facsimile, or otherwise; and to adopt and amend bylaws
as provided in this chapter;
(b)  to sue, be sued, complain, and defend in any court;
(c) (i)  to acquire, hold, sell, dispose of, and convey real and personal
estate consistent with the association's objects and powers;
(ii)  to mortgage, pledge, or lease any real or personal estate; and
(iii)  to take property by gift, devise, or bequest;
(d)  if and when an association is not a member of a federal home loan bank,
to borrow from sources, individual or corporate, in addition to its savings
liability and other accounts, not more than an aggregate amount equal to 25%
of its assets on the date of borrowing.  If and when an association is a
member of a federal home loan bank, to borrow from sources, individual or
corporate, in addition to its savings liability and other accounts, not more
than an aggregate amount equal to 60% of its assets on the date of borrowing
or a greater amount approved by the commissioner to insure parity between
state chartered savings and loan associations and federal associations.  It is
not a violation of this section if the borrowing limits are exceeded because
of a subsequent reduction in assets of an association.  Any association may
borrow such additional sums as the commissioner may approve in writing.  All
such loans and advances may be secured by property of the association, may be
made with convertible features, and may be evidenced by such notes, bonds,
debentures, commercial paper, bankers' acceptances, or other obligations or
securities (except capital stock and capital certificates) as may be generally
authorized by the commissioner, except that no authorization shall be required
for securities guaranteed under Section 306(g) of the National Housing Act of
1934;
(e)  to issue and sell, directly or through underwriters, capital certificates
containing a stated maturity date which represent nonwithdrawable capital
contributions, and constitute part of the reserves and net worth of the
association.  These certificates shall have no voting rights, shall be
subordinate to all savings accounts, debt obligations, and claims of creditors
of the association and shall constitute a claim in liquidation against any
reserves, surplus, and other net worth accounts remaining after the payment in
full of all savings accounts, debt obligations, and claims of creditors.  The
capital certificates shall be entitled to the payment of earnings prior to the
allocation of any income to surplus or other net worth accounts of the
association and may be issued with a fixed rate of earnings or with a prior
claim to distribution of a specified percentage of any net income remaining
after required allocations to reserves, or a combination thereof.  Losses
shall be charged against capital certificates only after reserves, surplus,
and other net worth accounts have been exhausted;
(f) (i)  to appoint and remove such officers, agents, and employees as its
business shall require and to provide them suitable compensation;
(ii)  to enter into employment contracts not to exceed 10 years without the
consent of the supervisor;
(iii)  to provide for life, health, and casualty insurance for officers and
employees;
(iv)  to adopt and operate reasonable bonus and incentive plans and retirement
benefits for those officers and employees; and
(v)  to provide for indemnification of its officers, employees, and directors
as required or permitted in this chapter, whether by insurance or otherwise;
(g)  to obtain and maintain insurance of its deposits by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or other federal deposit insurance agency;
(h)  to qualify as and become a member of any federal home loan bank;
(i) (i)  to act as fiscal agent of the United States, and, when so designated
by the Secretary of the Treasury, to perform, under such regulations as the
Secretary of the Treasury may prescribe, all such reasonable duties as fiscal
agent of the United States as the Secretary of the Treasury may require; and
(ii)  to act as agent for any instrumentality of the United States; and when
so designated by the state treasurer or other appropriate state officer, to
act as agent of that state or any instrumentality of that state;
(j)  to become a member of, deal with, maintain reserves or deposits with, or
make reasonable payments or contributions to any organization or
instrumentality, government or private, to the extent that the organization or
instrumentality assists in furthering or facilitating the association's
purposes, powers, services, or community responsibilities, and to comply with
any reasonable requirements or conditions of eligibility;
(k)  to act as depository for receipt of payments of federal or state taxes
and loan funds, and satisfy any federal or state statutory or regulatory
requirements in connection therewith, including:
(i)  pledging of assets as collateral;
(ii)  payment of earnings at prescribed rates; and
(iii)  notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, issuing the
account subject to rights of immediate withdrawal;
(l)  to sell or assign any loan, including any participating interest therein,
at any time;
(m)  to service loans and investments for others;
(n)  to act and receive compensation as trustee of any trust created or
organized in the United States and forming a part of a stock bonus, pension,
or profit-sharing plan which qualifies or qualified for specific tax treatment
under Section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and to act as trustee
or custodian of an individual retirement account within the meaning of Section
408 of that code.  All funds held in fiduciary capacity by any such
association under the authority of this subsection may be commingled and
consolidated for appropriate purposes of investment, so long as records
reflecting each separate beneficial interest are maintained by the fiduciary,
unless that responsibility is lawfully assumed by another appropriate party;
(o)  to act as assignee, agent, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator,
conservator, guardian, custodian, personal representative, or in any other
fiduciary capacity, and to execute trusts of every description not
inconsistent with law, and to receive reasonable compensation therefor.  An
association exercising trust or other fiduciary powers under this subsection
shall have all powers, privileges, and immunities granted in Chapter 5.  Funds
held by an association as fiduciary under this subsection may be commingled
and consolidated for appropriate purposes of investment, provided that records
reflecting the separate interest of each beneficiary shall be maintained by
the fiduciary, unless that responsibility is lawfully assumed by another
appropriate party.  Trust funds available for investment shall be invested at
the time and in the manner specified by the agreement, instrument, or order
creating or defining the fiduciary estate, but may be invested in savings
accounts of the associations, unless the instrument, agreement, or order
prohibits such investment;
(p)  subject to Chapter 16a, Automated Teller Machine Act, to engage in
financial transactions effected by electronic means;
(q)  to maintain and let safes, boxes, or other receptacles or premises for
the safekeeping of personal property upon such terms and conditions as may be
agreed upon;
(r)  to offer money orders, travel checks, and similar instruments for its own
account or as agent for any organization empowered to sell such instruments
through agents within this state;
(s)  to act as agent or escrowee for others;
(t)  to declare and pay dividends on capital stock in cash or property out of
the unreserved and unrestricted earned surplus of the association, or in its
own shares, from time to time, except when there is a deficiency in the
reserves or net worth of the association under rules issued by the
commissioner under Section 7-7-20, and except when the association is in an
impaired condition or when the payment thereof would cause the association to
be in an impaired condition.  A split-up or division of the issued shares of
capital stock into a greater number of shares without increasing the stated
capital of the association is authorized, and may not be construed to be a
dividend within the meaning of this section;
(u)  to acquire deposits from any individual or entity and pay earnings
thereon, to offer interest bearing or noninterest bearing accounts from which
withdrawals may be made by negotiable or transferable instruments for the
purpose of making transfers to third parties, and to lend, and commit to lend,
extend credit, and invest its funds as provided for in this chapter; and
(v)  to engage in other activities, exercise other powers and to enjoy other
rights, privileges, benefits, and immunities authorized by rules of the
commissioner and, particularly, under the authority given to the commissioner
in Subsection 7-1-301(3), which authority shall be exercised to prevent
competitive disparities between associations chartered in this state and
federal associations.
